California, session 20252026, AB450.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Addressing the needs of the aging population in California is of the utmost importance.(b) The Governor’s Master Plan for Aging established pursuant to Executive Order No. N-14-19 includes a goal of “inclusion and equity, not isolation,” which emphasizes both the need for lifelong opportunities for work, volunteering, engagement, and leadership, and protection against isolation, discrimination, abuse, neglect, and exploitation.(c) Policies to ensure that older adults in California are able to meet their needs as they age must be inclusive of older and aging immigrants, including those who may, as a result of their immigration status, be unable to access critical social services intended to assist older adults.SEC. 2. Article 6 (commencing with Section 9170) is added to Chapter 2 of Division 8.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read: Article 6. Support for Older and Aging Immigrants Regardless of Immigration Status9170. (a) The department shall oversee a stakeholder process to support the development of findings and recommendations on how to best support older and aging immigrants in California, regardless of their immigration status. To help inform the stakeholder process, the department shall establish a panel. The director may, if appropriate, modify an existing panel for purposes of this article, subject to the requirements described in Section 9171.(b) The department may contract with academic research entities to commission expert research and testimony to supplement the stakeholder process and support the development of findings and recommendations required by this article.9171. (a) The panel established pursuant to Section 9170 shall invite stakeholders and subject matter experts, including representatives from the State Department of Social Services, clinics, researchers, housing advocates, trusted community partners, and nonprofit organizations to participate in the stakeholder process. As appropriate, the costs of the panel and the stakeholder process may be reduced by in-kind or other contributions from third parties.(b) During the stakeholder process, the department and members of the panel shall consider issues including, but not limited to, affordability and guaranteed basic income, access to social services and housing, and access to health care services, including specialty care and language access.(c) The first meeting of the panel shall be held no later than 120 days after funding becomes available for purposes of this section.9172. (a) Upon completion of the stakeholder process required by this article, but by no later than July 1, 2028, the panel shall issue findings and recommendations to the department and the State Department of Social Services on the most effective ways to implement policies and programs to support older and aging immigrants in California, regardless of their immigration status.(b) On or before December 31, 2028, the department and the State Department of Social Services shall jointly present a report including the findings and recommendations provided by the panel under subdivision (a) to the Legislature.9173. For purposes of this article, “older and aging” means an adult 60 years of age or older.9174. This article shall be implemented upon appropriation by the Legislature for purposes of this article.9175. This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.